Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.035

Waiver of examination.

The commission may, in its discretion, waive any examination required by this chapter of persons applying for a license to practice chiropractic if, in its opinion, the applicant has successfully passed an examination conducted by the national board of chiropractic examiners of the United States that is of equal or greater difficulty than the examination being waived by the commission.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 112; 1971 ex.s. c 227 s 5.]